Hawaii statutes.
§431:15-402 Liquidation of property of
foreign or alien insurers found in this State. (a) If no domiciliary
receiver has been appointed, the commissioner may apply to the circuit court of
the first judicial circuit by verified petition for an order directing the
commissioner to liquidate the assets found in this State of a foreign insurer,
or an alien insurer not domiciled in this State, on any of the following
grounds:

(1) Any of the grounds in section 431:15-301 or
section 431:15-306; or

(2) Any of the grounds specified in section
431:15-401(a)(2) through (a)(4).

(b) When an order is sought under subsection
(a), the court may require an appropriate notice to the insurer and hearing.
If it appears to the court that the best interests of creditors, policyholders,
and the public so require, the court may issue an order to liquidate the
insurer in whatever terms it considers appropriate. The filing or recording of
the order with the bureau of conveyances imparts the same notice as an evidence
of title.

(c) If a domiciliary liquidator is appointed
in a reciprocal state while a liquidation is proceeding under this section, the
liquidator under this section shall thereafter act as ancillary receiver under
section 431:15-404. If a domiciliary liquidator is appointed in a
nonreciprocal state while a liquidation is proceeding under this section, the
liquidator under this section may petition the court for permission to act as
ancillary receiver under section 431:15-404.

(d) On the same grounds as specified in
subsection (a), the commissioner may petition any appropriate federal district
court to be appointed receiver to liquidate that portion of the insurer's
assets and business over which the court will exercise jurisdiction, or any
lesser part thereof that the commissioner deems desirable for the protection of
the policyholders and creditors in this State.

(e) The court may order the commissioner, when
the commissioner has liquidated assets of a foreign or alien insurer under this
section, to pay claims of residents of this State against the insurer under
such rules as to the liquidation of insurers under this article as are
otherwise compatible with the provisions of this section. [L 1987, c 347, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next